Illinois, session 104th, HB2170.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Fair Admissions Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 29/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Higher Education Fair Admissions Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-54, eff. 1-1-22.)